District of Columbia statutes.
50-1541.22

Rights of purchaser other than secured party.

(a)

A buyer in ordinary course of business has the protections afforded by §§ 28:2-403(2) and 28:9-320(a) even if an existing certificate of title was not signed and delivered to the buyer or a new certificate of title listing the buyer as owner of record was not created.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in §§ 50-1541.16 and 50-1541.23, the rights of a purchaser of a vessel that is not a buyer in ordinary course of business or a lien creditor are governed by Subtitle I of Title 28.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-215, § 23, 61 DCR 13083

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-215: Section 32 of D.C. Law 20-215 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2016.